Utah statutes.
51-9-202.   Permanent state trust fund.

(1)  Until July 1, 2003, 50% of all funds of every kind that are received by the state that are related to the settlement agreement that the state entered into with leading tobacco manufacturers on November 23, 1998, shall be deposited into the permanent state trust fund created by and operated under Utah Constitution Article XXII, Section 4.

(2)  On and after July 1, 2003 and until July 1, 2004 20% of the funds of any kind received by the state that are related to the settlement agreement that the state entered into with leading tobacco manufacturers shall be deposited into the permanent state trust fund created by and operated under Utah Constitution Article XXII, Section 4.

(3)  On and after July 1, 2004 and until July 1, 2005, 30% of all funds of any kind received by the state that are related to the settlement agreement that the state entered into with leading tobacco manufacturers shall be deposited into the General Fund Budget Reserve Account created in Section 63J-1-312.

(4)  On and after July 1, 2005 and until July 1, 2007, 25% of all funds of any kind received by the state that are related to the settlement agreement that the state entered into with leading tobacco manufacturers shall be deposited into the permanent state trust fund created by and operated under Utah Constitution Article XXII, Section 4.

(5)  On and after July 1, 2007, 40% of all funds of every kind that are received by the state that are related to the settlement agreement that the state entered into with leading tobacco manufacturers on November 23, 1998, shall be deposited into the General Fund and the remaining funds deposited as directed.

(6)  Funds in the permanent state trust fund shall be deposited or invested pursuant to Chapter 7b, Investment of Permanent State Trust Fund Money.

(7) (a)  In accordance with Utah Constitution Article XXII, Section 4, the interest and dividends earned annually from the permanent state trust fund shall be deposited in the General Fund.  There shall be transferred on an ongoing basis from the General Fund to the permanent state trust fund created under Utah Constitution Article XXII, Section 4, an amount equal to 50% of the interest and dividends earned annually from the permanent state trust fund.  The amount transferred into the fund under this Subsection (7)(a) shall be treated as principal.

(b)  Any annual interest or dividends earned from the permanent state trust fund that remain in the General Fund after Subsection (7)(a) may be appropriated by the Legislature.

(c)  Any realized or unrealized gains or losses on investments in the permanent state trust fund shall remain in the permanent state trust fund.

(8)  This section does not apply to funds deposited under Chapter 9, Part 3, Infrastructure and Economic Diversification Investment Account and Deposit of Certain Severance Taxes into Permanent State Trust Fund Act, into the permanent state trust fund.



Amended by Chapter 211, 2013 General Session

